Hawaii statutes.
§461J-5 Powers and duties of board.
In addition to any other powers and duties authorized by law, the board may:

(1) Adopt, amend, or repeal rules in accordance with
chapter 91 for the purposes of this chapter;

(2) Recommend the denial or withdrawal of
accreditation from educational programs for failure to meet prescribed
standards;

(3) Conduct hearings upon charges calling for
discipline of a licensee or denial, suspension, limitation, or revocation of a
license;

(4) Exercise the power to issue subpoenas, compel the
attendance of witnesses, and administer oaths to persons giving testimony at
hearings;

(5) Enforce this chapter and the rules adopted
pursuant thereto; and

(6) Keep a record of all its proceedings. [L 1985, c
276, pt of §1; am L 1992, c 202, §141]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next